test/src/morphology/N-xawo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ха: # Noun 'ear' - full paradigm /Type 5/
     ха+N+Sg+Nom: ха
     ха+N+Sg+Acc: хамʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen: хаʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat: ханʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc: хахана
     ха+N+Sg+Abl: хахад
     ха+N+Sg+Pros: хавна
     ха+N+Du+Nom: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom: хаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Acc: хаво
     ха+N+Pl+Gen: хавоˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Dat: хахаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc: хахаˮна
     ха+N+Pl+Abl: хахат
     ха+N+Pl+Pros: хаˮамна
     
     ха+N+Tra: хаӈэ
     ха+N+Car: хасиˮ
     ха+N+Equ: хадремʼ
     ха+N+Equ+Lat: хадревʼ
     
# Possessive forms 
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: хав 
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хар  
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хада 
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хамиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хариʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хадиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хаваˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хараˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хадоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хав   
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хами  
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хамд  
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хамда 
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хамиʼ 
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хамдиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хамдиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хаваˮ 
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хамдаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хамдоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хан   
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хани  
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ханд  
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ханда 
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ханиʼ 
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ханаˮ 
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хахан   
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хахани  
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хаханд  
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хаханда 
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хаханиʼ 
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хахандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хахандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хаханаˮ 
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хахандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хахандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хаханан   
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хаханани  
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хахананд  
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хахананда 
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хахананиʼ 
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хаханандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хаханандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хахананаˮ 
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хаханандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хаханандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хахадан   
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хахадани  
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хахаданд  
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хахаданда 
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хахаданиʼ 
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хахадандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хахадандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хахаданаˮ 
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хахадандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хахадандоʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хавнан   
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хавнани  
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хавнанд  
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хавнанда 
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хавнаниʼ 
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хавнандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хавнандиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хавнанаˮ 
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хавнандаˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хавнандоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хахаюн  
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хахаюд  
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хахаюда 
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хахаюниʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хахаюдаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хахаюдоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: хахаюн  
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хахаюд  
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хахаюда 
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хахаюниʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хахаюдаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хахаюдоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: хахаюн  
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хахают  
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хахаюта 
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хахаюниʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хахаютиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хахаютиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хахаютаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хахаютоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хавон   
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хавод   
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хавода  
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хавониʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хаводиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хаводиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хавонаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хаводаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хаводоʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: хавон   
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хавод   
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хавода  
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хавониʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хаводиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хаводиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хавонаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хаводаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хаводоʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хавоˮн  
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хавот   
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хавота  
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хавоˮниʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хавотиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хавотиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хавоˮнаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хавотаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хавотоʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: хахаˮн 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хахат 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хахата 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хахаˮниʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хахатиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хахатиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хахаˮнаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хахатаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хахатоʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хахаˮнан  
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хахаˮнат  
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хахаˮната 
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хахаˮнаниʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хахаˮнатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хахаˮнатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хахаˮнанаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хахаˮнатаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хахаˮнатоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хахатан 
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хахатат 
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хахатата 
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хахатаниʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хахататиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хахататиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хахатанаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хахататаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хахататоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: хавоˮманан  
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хавоˮманат  
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хавоˮманата 
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хавоˮмананиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хавоˮманатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хавоˮманатиʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хавоˮмананаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хавоˮманатаˮ
     ха+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хавоˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative

     ха+N+Pred+Abs: хад 
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: хадав 
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хадар  
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: хадада 
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: хадав
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хадамд
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хадамда
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: хадан
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хаданд
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хаданда
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: хадамиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: хадариʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: хададиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: хадамиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хадамдиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хадамдиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: хаданиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хадандиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хадандиʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: хадаваˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: хадараˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: хададоʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: хадаваˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хадамдаˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: хадамдоʼ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: хаданаˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хадандаˮ
     ха+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: хадандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: [хадмʼ, хамʼ]
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хан  
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ха   
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ханиʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хадиʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хахаʼ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хаваˮ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хадаˮ
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хаˮ  
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [хадамзь, хаманзь]
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ханась 
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хась   
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ханинзь
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хадинзь
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хаханзь
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хаваць 
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хадаць 
     ха+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хаць   
                    
# Predicative Possessive forms 

     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хав 
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хар  
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хада 
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хамиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хариʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хадиʼ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хаваˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хараˮ
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хадоʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюн  
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюд  
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюда 
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюниʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюдиʼ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюнаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюдаˮ
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хахаюдоʼ
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хан   
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хад   
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хада  
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хадиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хадиʼ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хадаˮ 
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хадоʼ 
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хавась
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: харась
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хадась
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хаминзь
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: харинзь
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хадинзь
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хаваць
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хараць
     ха+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хадонзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюнась
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюдась
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюдась
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюнинзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюдинзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюдинзь
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюнаць
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюдаць
     ха+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хахаюдонзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханась
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хадась
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хадась
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханинзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хадинзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хадинзь
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханаць
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хадаць
     ха+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хадонзь
